pt-PT: Características do helicóptero de brinquedo: Controlo resistente a interferências de 2,4 GHz; Manutenção de altitude; Descolagem/aterragem automática; Câmara; Design durável/resistente a choques; Estabilização giroscópica; Seguro para interiores (proteções das hélices); Luzes LED; Vários modos de velocidade; Efeitos sonoros; Pás de rotor sobresselentes incluídas; Ajuste de estabilização; Outro
lt-LT: Žaislinio sraigtasparnio savybės: 2,4 GHz trikdžiams atsparus valdymas; Aukščio palaikymas; Automatinis pakilimas / nusileidimas; Kamera; Patvarus / smūgiams atsparus dizainas; Giroskopinis stabilizavimas; Saugus naudoti patalpose (propelerių apsaugos); LED žibintai; Keli greičio režimai; Garso efektai; Pridedamos atsarginės rotoriaus mentės; Balanso reguliavimas; Kita
th: เฮลิคอปเตอร์ของเล่น มีคุณสมบัติ: ควบคุมความถี่ 2.4 GHz กันสัญญาณรบกวน; รักษาระดับความสูง; ขึ้นบิน/ลงจอดอัตโนมัติ; กล้องถ่ายรูป; ดีไซน์ทนทาน/กันกระแทก; ระบบกันสั่นไจโร; ปลอดภัยเมื่อเล่นในร่ม (มีที่ป้องกันใบพัด); ไฟ LED; โหมดความเร็วหลายระดับ; เอฟเฟกต์เสียง; มีใบพัดสำรองให้; ปรับความสมดุล; อื่นๆ
el: Χαρακτηριστικά παιχνιδιού ελικοπτέρου: Έλεγχος με αντοχή σε παρεμβολές 2,4 GHz; Διατήρηση υψομέτρου; Αυτόματη απογείωση/προσγείωση; Κάμερα; Ανθεκτικός σχεδιασμός/αντοχή σε πτώσεις; Σταθεροποίηση γυροσκοπίου; Ασφαλές για εσωτερικό χώρο (προστατευτικά έλικα); Φώτα LED; Πολλαπλές λειτουργίες ταχύτητας; Ηχητικά εφέ; Περιλαμβάνονται εφεδρικά πτερύγια ρότορα; Ρύθμιση ισοστάθμισης; Άλλο
vi: Đặc điểm của máy bay trực thăng đồ chơi: Điều khiển chống nhiễu 2,4 GHz; Giữ độ cao; Tự động cất cánh/hạ cánh; Camera; Thiết kế bền bỉ/chống va đập; Ổn định con quay hồi chuyển; An toàn trong nhà (khung bảo vệ cánh quạt); Đèn LED; Nhiều chế độ tốc độ; Hiệu ứng âm thanh; Kèm cánh quạt dự phòng; Điều chỉnh cân bằng (Trim); Khác
de: Funktionen des Spielzeughubschraubers: Störungssichere 2,4-GHz-Steuerung; Höhenhaltung; Automatischer Start/Landung; Kamera; Langlebiges/bruchsicheres Design; Gyrostabilisierung; Sicher für drinnen (Propellerschutz); LED-Leuchten; Mehrere Geschwindigkeitsmodi; Soundeffekte; Inklusive Ersatz-Rotorblätter; Trimmeinstellung; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Funkcie hračkárskeho vrtuľníka: 2,4 GHz ovládanie odolné voči rušeniu; Udržiavanie výšky; Automatický vzlet/pristátie; Kamera; Odolný/nárazuvzdorný dizajn; Gyroskopická stabilizácia; Bezpečné do interiéru (kryty vrtúľ); LED svetlá; Viacero rýchlostných režimov; Zvukové efekty; Vrátane náhradných lopatiek rotora; Nastavenie trimovania; Iné
ja: おもちゃのヘリコプター機能: 2.4 GHz 耐干渉コントロール; 高度維持; 自動離着陸; カメラ; 耐久性 / 耐衝撃性デザイン; ジャイロ安定化; 屋内安全 (プロペラガード付き); LED ライト; 複数スピードモード; サウンドエフェクト; 予備のローターブレード付属; トリム調整; その他
sl-SI: Lastnosti igralnega helikopterja: Upravljanje 2,4 GHz, odporno na motnje; Vzdrževanje višine; Samodejni vzlet/pristanek; Kamera; Trpežna zasnova/odporna na udarce; Žiroskopska stabilizacija; Varno za notranjo uporabo (ščitniki propelerja); Luči LED; Več nastavitev hitrosti; Zvočni učinki; Vključene rezervne lopatice rotorja; Nastavitev stabilnosti letenja (trim); Drugo
cs: Vlastnosti modelu vrtulníku: Ovládání na frekvenci 2,4 GHz odolné proti rušení; Udržování výšky; Automatický vzlet/přistání; Kamera; Odolný design / proti nárazu; Gyroskopická stabilizace; Bezpečné pro interiér (kryty vrtulí); LED světla; Několik rychlostních režimů; Zvukové efekty; Včetně náhradních listů rotoru; Nastavení trimu; Jiné
fr: Caractéristiques de l’hélicoptère jouet: Contrôle 2,4 GHz sans interférence; Maintien de l’altitude; Décollage/atterrissage automatique; Caméra; Conception durable/résistante aux chocs; Stabilisation gyroscopique; Sécuritaire pour l’intérieur (protège-hélices); Lumières LED; Plusieurs modes de vitesse; Effets sonores; Pales de rechange incluses; Ajustement du trim; Autre
tr: Oyuncak helikopterin özellikleri: 2,4 GHz parazit korumalı kontrol; İrtifa sabitleme; Otomatik kalkış/iniş; Kamera; Dayanıklı/çarpışmaya dirençli tasarım; Cayroskop sabitleme; İç mekanda güvenli (pervane korumaları); LED ışıklar; Çoklu hız modları; Ses efektleri; Yedek rotor kanatları dahil; Trim ayarı; Diğer
zh-TW: 玩具直升機功能: 2.4 GHz 抗干擾控制; 定高懸停; 自動起飛/降落; 攝影機; 耐用/防撞設計; 陀螺儀穩定; 室內安全 (螺旋槳護罩); LED 燈; 多段速度模式; 音效; 內含備用旋翼葉片; 微調; 其他
hr-HR: Značajke helikoptera igračke: Upravljanje na 2,4 GHz otporno na smetnje; Održavanje visine; Automatsko uzlijetanje/slijetanje; Kamera; Izdržljiv dizajn otporan na udarce; Žiroskopska stabilizacija; Sigurno za zatvorene prostore (štitnici za propelere); LED svjetla; Više načina brzine; Zvučni efekti; Uključene rezervne lopatice rotora; Podešavanje trimanja; Ostalo
fi: Leluhelikopterin ominaisuudet: 2,4 GHz:n häiriösuojattu ohjaus; Korkeuden säätö; Automaattinen nousu/laskeutuminen; Kamera; Kestävä/iskunkestävä rakenne; Gyrovakautus; Turvallinen sisäkäyttöön (potkurisuojat); LED-valot; Useita nopeustiloja; Äänitehosteet; Sisältää vararoottorinlavat; Trimmin säätö; Muu
pl: Funkcje zabawkowego helikoptera: Sterowanie 2,4 GHz odporne na zakłócenia; Utrzymywanie wysokości; Automatyczny start/lądowanie; Kamera; Wytrzymała/odporna na upadki konstrukcja; Stabilizacja żyroskopowa; Bezpieczne w pomieszczeniach (osłony śmigieł); Światła LED; Wiele trybów prędkości; Efekty dźwiękowe; Zapasowe łopaty wirnika w zestawie; Trymowanie; Inne
it: Caratteristiche dell'elicottero giocattolo: Controllo resistente alle interferenze a 2,4 GHz; Mantenimento dell'altitudine; Decollo/atterraggio automatico; Fotocamera; Design resistente/antiurto; Stabilizzazione giroscopica; Sicuro per interni (protezioni per eliche); Luci LED; Molteplici modalità di velocità; Effetti sonori; Pale del rotore di ricambio incluse; Regolazione del trim; Altro
nb: Funksjoner til lekehelikopter: 2,4 GHz interferensbestandig styring; Høydeholding; Automatisk letting/landing; Kamera; Slitesterk / kollisjonssikker design; Gyrostabilisering; Trygg innendørs (propellbeskyttere); LED-lys; Flere hastighetsmoduser; Lydeffekter; Ekstra rotorblader inkludert; Trimjustering; Annet
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale elicopterului de jucărie: Control rezistent la interferențe de 2,4 GHz; Menținere altitudine; Decolare/aterizare automată; Cameră foto/video; Design durabil/rezistent la impact; Stabilizare giroscopică; Sigur pentru interior (protecții pentru elice); Lumini LED; Mai multe moduri de viteză; Efecte sonore; Pale de rotor de rezervă incluse; Ajustare fină (trim); Altele
nl: Speelgoedhelikopter kenmerken: 2,4 GHz storingsvrije bediening; Hoogtebehoud; Automatisch opstijgen/landen; Camera; Duurzaam/crashbestendig ontwerp; Gyrostabilisatie; Veilig voor binnen (propellerbeschermers); Ledverlichting; Meerdere snelheidsmodi; Geluidseffecten; Inclusief reserve-rotorbladen; Trimafstelling; Overig
ru: Особенности игрушечного вертолета: Помехозащищенное управление 2,4 ГГц; Удержание высоты; Автоматический взлет/посадка; Камера; Ударопрочная конструкция; Гироскопическая стабилизация; Безопасно для помещений (защита пропеллеров); Светодиодная подсветка; Несколько скоростных режимов; Звуковые эффекты; Запасные лопасти в комплекте; Настройка триммера; Другое
sv: Leksakshelikopter – funktioner: 2,4 GHz störningsfri styrning; Höjdhållning; Automatisk start/landning; Kamera; Slitstark/kraschtålig design; Gyrostabilisering; Inomhussäker (propellerskydd); LED-ljus; Flera hastighetslägen; Ljudeffekter; Extra rotorblad ingår; Trimjustering; Övrigt
ko: 장난감 헬리콥터 특징: 2.4GHz 간섭 방지 제어; 고도 유지; 자동 이착륙; 카메라; 내구성/충돌 방지 디자인; 자이로 안정화; 실내 사용 안전(프로펠러 가드); LED 라이트; 다중 속도 모드; 사운드 효과; 여분 로터 블레이드 포함; 트림 조절; 기타
zh-CN: 玩具直升机的特点: 2.4 GHz 抗干扰控制; 定高; 自动起飞/降落; 摄像头; 耐用/防撞设计; 陀螺仪稳定; 室内安全（螺旋桨保护罩）; LED 灯; 多速度模式; 音效; 随附备用旋翼叶片; 微调; 其他
en: Toy helicopter features: 2.4 GHz interference-resistant control; Altitude hold; Auto takeoff/landing; Camera; Durable/crash-resistant design; Gyro stabilization; Indoor safe (propeller guards); LED lights; Multiple speed modes; Sound effects; Spare rotor blades included; Trim adjustment; Other
bg-BG: Характеристики на играчка хеликоптер: 2,4 GHz управление, устойчиво на смущения; Поддържане на височина; Автоматично излитане/кацане; Камера; Издръжлив/устойчив на сблъсък дизайн; Жироскопична стабилизация; Безопасно за закрито (предпазители за перки); LED светлини; Множество режими на скорост; Звукови ефекти; Включени резервни перки за ротор; Регулиране на тримера (настройка на баланса); Друго
es: Características del helicóptero de juguete: Control de 2,4 GHz resistente a interferencias; Mantenimiento de altitud; Despegue/aterrizaje automático; Cámara; Diseño duradero/resistente a choques; Estabilización giroscópica; Seguro para interiores (protectores de hélice); Luces LED; Múltiples modos de velocidad; Efectos de sonido; Palas de rotor de repuesto incluidas; Ajuste de compensación; Otro
hu: Játékhelikopter jellemzői: 2,4 GHz-es interferenciatűrő vezérlés; Magasságtartás; Automatikus fel- és leszállás; Kamera; Strapabíró / törésálló kialakítás; Giroszkópos stabilizáció; Beltérben is biztonságos (propellervédőkkel); LED-fények; Több sebességfokozat; Hangeffektek; Tartalék rotorlapátokkal; Trim beállítás; Egyéb
da: Funktioner for legetøjshelikopter: 2,4 GHz interferensresistent styring; Højdehold; Automatisk start/landing; Kamera; Holdbart/styrtresistent design; Gyrostabilisering; Sikker indendørs (propelbeskyttere); LED-lys; Flere hastighedstilstande; Lydeffekter; Ekstra rotorblade medfølger; Trimjustering; Andet
pt-BR: Helicóptero de brinquedo recursos: Controle resistente a interferências de 2,4 GHz; Manutenção de altitude; Decolagem/pouso automáticos; Câmera; Design durável/resistente a impactos; Estabilização por giroscópio; Seguro para ambientes internos (protetores de hélice); Luzes de LED; Vários modos de velocidade; Efeitos sonoros; Pás de rotor sobressalentes incluídas; Ajuste de compensação; Outros